District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.56e

Submission of Reports to District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Assistance Authority.

In the case of any report submitted by the Mayor under this subpart for a fiscal year (or any quarter of a fiscal year) which is a control year under the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, the Mayor shall submit the report to the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority established under § 47-391.01(a) in addition to any other individual to whom the Mayor is required to submit the report under this subpart.

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, § 456(e)
as added Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 140, Pub. L. 104-8, § 224(b)(2)

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 47-235.

References in Text

The District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Act of 1995, referred to in this section, is Pub. Law 104-8, 109 Stat. 97, codified primarily as subchapters I-A and VII of Chapter 3 of this title.